incubator/apertium-ovd.ovd.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
    Copyright (C) 2014-2016, Apertium contributors (see AUTHORS file)

    This file is part of apertium-ovd.

    apertium-ovd is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
    it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
    the Free Software Foundation, either version 2 of the License, or
    (at your option) any later version.

    apertium-ovd is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
    but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
    MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
    GNU General Public License for more details.

    You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
    along with apertium-ovd.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>AaĄąBbCcDdĐðEeĘęFfGgHhIiĮįJjKkLlMmNnOoPpQqRrSsTtUuŲųVvWwXxYyY̨y̨ZzÅåĄ̊ą̊ÄäÖö</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
		<sdef n="np" 	c="Proper noun"/>
		<sdef n="top"   c="Toponym"/>
                <sdef n="attr"  c="Attributive (certain proper nouns)"/>
		<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/>
		<sdef n="ref" 	c="Reflexive pronoun"/>
		<sdef n="res" 	c="Reciprocal pronoun"/>
		<sdef n="det" 	c="Determiner"/>
		<sdef n="pos" 	c="Possessive"/>
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="1st person"/>
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="2nd person"/>
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="3rd person"/>
		<sdef n="nt" 	c="Neuter"/>
		<sdef n="mf" 	c="Masculine / feminine, also utrum in nouns"/>
		<sdef n="f" 	c="Feminine"/>
		<sdef n="m" 	c="Masculine"/>
		<sdef n="un" 	c="No gender"/>
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="Singular / plural"/>
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="Singular"/>
		<sdef n="du" 	c="Dual (generation only)"/>
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="Plural"/>
		<sdef n="ind" 	c="Indefinite"/>
		<sdef n="def" 	c="Definite"/>
		<sdef n="nom" 	c="Nominative"/>
		<sdef n="acc" 	c="Accusative"/>
		<sdef n="gen" 	c="Genitive"/>
		<sdef n="dat" 	c="Dative"/>
		<sdef n="dem" 	c="Demonstrative"/>
		<sdef n="itg" 	c="Question word / interrogative"/>
 		<sdef n="qnt" 	c="Quantifier"/>
                <sdef n="neg" 	c="Negative"/>
		<sdef n="emph" 	c="Emphatic"/>
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="Verb"/>
		<sdef n="pass" 	c="-st form"/>
		<sdef n="pstv" 	c="-st verb"/>
		<sdef n="inf" 	c="Infinitive"/>
		<sdef n="pres" 	c="Present"/>
		<sdef n="imp" 	c="Imperative"/>
		<sdef n="pret" 	c="Preterite"/>
		<sdef n="pp" 	c="Perfect participle (vblex/adj)"/>
		<sdef n="pprs" 	c="Present participle (adjectival)"/>
		<sdef n="pr" 	c="Preposition"/>
		<sdef n="adv" 	c="Adverb"/>
                <sdef n="ij" 	c="Interjection"/>
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/>
		<sdef n="sint" 	c="Synthetic (of adjectives)"/>
		<sdef n="part" 	c="Participle (infinitive)"/>
		<sdef n="sep" 	c="Seperable verb/particle"/>
		<sdef n="cnjsub" 	c="Subordinating conjunction"/>
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
		<sdef n="cnjadv" 	c="Adverbial conjunction"/>
		<sdef n="pst" 	c="Positive"/>
		<sdef n="comp" 	c="Comparative"/>
		<sdef n="sup" 	c="Superlative"/>
		<sdef n="num" 	c="Numeral"/>
		<sdef n="ord" 	c="Ordinal"/>
		<sdef n="acr" 	c="Acronym"/>
                <sdef n="unc"   c="Uncountable"/>
		<sdef n="sent" 	c="Sentence end"/>
		<sdef n="cm" 	c="Comma"/>
		<sdef n="apos" 	c="Apostrophe"/>
		<sdef n="clb" 	c="Possible clause boundary"/>
		<sdef n="overskrift" 	c="Headline"/>
		<sdef n="lpar" 	c="Left parenthesis"/>
		<sdef n="rpar" 	c="Right parenthesis"/>

		<sdef n="compound-only-L" 	c="May only be the left-side of a compound"/>
		<sdef n="compound-only-R" 	c="requires https://github.com/unhammer/lttoolbox/tree/compound-only-R"/>
		<sdef n="compound-R" 	c="May be the right-side of a compound, or a full word"/>
		<sdef n="cmp" 	c="Generation only: added by transfer to say we have a compound"/>
		<sdef n="cmp-split" 	c="Left part of a split compound"/>
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
<pardef n="numeros">
  <!-- separate out the number 1 as singular (fortunately "1.00" is usually plural!) -->
  <e>       <re>1</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[02-9]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[0-9][.,][0-9]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <re>[½¹²³¼¾]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="separa">
  <e>       <p><l>..</l><r>..<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>...</l><r>...<s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>[.\?;:!…¿¶]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/><s n="clb"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aposchar">
  <e>       <i>'</i></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="cometa">
  <e>       <par n="aposchar"/><p><l></l><r><s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="paresq">
  <e>       <re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="pardret">
  <e>       <re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Uninflected parts: -->
<pardef n="mes__cnjsub">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="um__pr">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="so__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ja__ij">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<!-- Verbs: -->
<pardef n="/wårå__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>wårå</l>   <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ir</l>     <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irum</l>   <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irið</l>   <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>irir</l>   <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>irå</l>    <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>war</l>    <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>warum</l>  <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>warið</l>  <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>waru</l>   <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>wari</l>   <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>warið</l>  <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>wärend</l> <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>werid</l>  <r>wårå<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ja">                       <i>ja</i> <par n="ja__ij"/></e>
<e lm="nei">                       <i>nei</i> <par n="ja__ij"/></e>
<e lm="nor" c="når">                       <i>nor</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="bara" c="berre">                       <i>bara</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kanstji" c="kanskje">                       <i>kanstji</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="so">                                <i>so</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="auti" c="ute">                      <i>auti</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="iend" c="einaste">                  <i>iend</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="launggsamt">                        <i>launggsamt</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="undą̊">                              <i>undą̊</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="upå">                              <i>upå</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="undą̊ för undą̊" c="litt etter litt"> <i>undą̊<b/>för<b/>undą̊</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="laindj i seð" c="i lange tider">    <i>laindj<b/>i<b/>seð</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="it" c="ikkje">                      <i>it</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="itte" c="ikkje">                    <i>itte</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="slaikan">                           <i>slaikan</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nu" c="LR of nų?">                  <i>nu</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nų">                                <i>nų</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="dą̊">                                <i>dą̊</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="et lands">                          <i>et<b/>lands</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="et friðs">                          <i>et<b/>friðs</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="jär" c="her">                       <i>jär</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kringgt" c="ofte">                  <i>kringgt</i> <par n="so__adv"/></e>
<e lm="um">  <i>um</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="et">  <i>et</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="för"> <i>för</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="að"> <i>að</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="auti"> <i>auti</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="yvyr"> <i>yvyr</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="dar"> <i>dar</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="wįster"> <i>wįster</i> <par n="um__pr"/></e>
<e lm="mes"> <i>mes</i> <par n="mes__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="wårå"> <i></i> <par n="/wårå__vblex"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="numeros"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="separa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="cometa"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="paresq"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="pardret"/></e>
